Maryland, session 2026, HB1460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
SUBTITLE 11. INVESTOR–OWNED SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY.
8–1101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1460*

HOUSE BILL 1460
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(C) “ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY” MEANS:
(1) FOR PUBLIC HOUSING AND FEDERALLY OR STATE ASSISTED
HOUSING, THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(2) FOR PRIVATE RENTAL PROPERTY THAT DOES NOT ACCEPT
HOUSING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FUNDS, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(D) “FAIR MARKET RENT” MEANS THE MOST RECENTLY PUBLISHED
ANNUAL FAIR MARKET RENT RATE SET BY THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT.
(E) “INVESTOR–OWNED SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY” MEANS A
SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY OWNED BY A PERSON THAT OWNS TWO OR MORE
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTIES IN THE STATE.
(F) “MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE RENT” MEANS THE GREATER OF:
(1) 120% OF THE FAIR MARKET RENT FOR THE ZIP CODE OF A
SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY; OR
(2) 120% OF THE LAST RECORDED SALE PRICE OF THE
SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY DIVIDED BY 12.
(G) “SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY” MEANS A SINGLE–FAMILY
ATTACHED OR DETACHED RESIDENTIAL DWELLING LEASED TO TENANTS.
8–1102.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO AN INVESTOR–OWNED
SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) AN OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENCE WITH ONLY A PORTION OF THE
RESIDENCE AVAILABLE FOR RENT;

HOUSE BILL 1460 3
(2) A SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY SUBJECT TO A LONG–TERM
AFFORDABILITY COVENANT; OR
(3) A LICENSED KINSHIP HOME OR FOSTER CARE HOME.
8–1103.
(A) A LANDLORD MAY NOT:
(1) CHARGE MORE THAN:
(I) THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE RENT;
(II) THE DOCUMENTED COST OF UTILITIES; OR
(III) $100 PER MONTH FOR ADDITIONAL MANDATORY FEES; OR
(2) USE OTHER FEES OR CHARGES TO CIRCUMVENT THE LIMITS
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) BEFORE A PROSPECTIVE TENANT ENTERS INTO OR A TENANT RENEWS A
LEASE AGREEMENT, A LANDLORD SHALL DISCLOSE IN A SWORN STATEMENT IN THE
PRIMARY LANGUAGE OF THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT OR TENANT:
(1) THE FAIR MARKET RENT AT THE TIME OF THE AGREEMENT OR
RENEWAL;
(2) THE LAST SALE PRICE OF THE RESIDENTIAL DWELLING; AND
(3) THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE RENT.
(C) (1) A TENANT OR PROSPECTIVE TENANT HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A
LANDLORD FOR:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(II) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES; AND
(III) TREBLE DAMAGES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OR THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL,
AS APPLICABLE, MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1460
(I) FINE A LANDLORD UP TO $10,000; AND
(II) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL
HOUSING AUTHORITY, SUSPEND THE LANDLORD’S RENTAL LICENSE.
(D) (1) A LANDLORD MAY NOT RETALIATE AGAINST A TENANT WHO
ASSERTS THE TENANT’S RIGHTS ESTABLISHED BY THIS SECTION OR WHO REPORTS
PRICE GOUGING OR INSUFFICIENT DISCLOSURE TO AN ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY RELIEF GRANTED UNDER § 8–208.1 OF THIS
TITLE, IF A LANDLORD RETALIATES AGAINST A TENANT:
(I) THE TENANT MAY REQUIRE THE LANDLORD TO SIGN A
12–MONTH LEASE RENEWAL AT THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE RENT; AND
(II) AN ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $10,000.
8–1104.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE REGISTRY OF INVESTOR–OWNED SINGLE–FAMILY RENTAL PROPERTY
LANDLORDS.
(B) A LANDLORD SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT, ON A FORM AND IN
A MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) THE LANDLORD’S LEGAL NAME;
(2) IF THE LANDLORD IS AN INDIVIDUAL, THE PRIMARY RESIDENTIAL
ADDRESS OF THE LANDLORD;
(3) IF THE LANDLORD IS AN ENTITY, THE ADDRESS OF THE
LANDLORD’S PRIMARY PLACE OF BUSINESS;
(4) AN ACTIVE PHONE NUMBER AND E–MAIL ADDRESS AT WHICH THE
LANDLORD MAY BE CONTACTED; AND
(5) A PRINCIPAL AGENT OF THE LANDLORD, INCLUDING THE AGENT’S
FULL CONTACT INFORMATION.

HOUSE BILL 1460 5
(C) IF A LANDLORD SUBMITS FALSE INFORMATION FOR THE REGISTRY, AN
ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) REQUIRE A CORRECTION;
(2) IMPOSE A CIVIL FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000;
(3) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY HOUSING
AUTHORITY, SUSPEND ANY RENTAL LICENSES HELD BY THE LANDLORD; AND
(4) PROHIBIT THE LANDLORD FROM OFFERING A PROPERTY FOR
LEASE FOR UP TO 3 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.